Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2019XS (5) 91 dg/ko S.F. 236 Section 1. Section 237.10, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 9A. a. The department shall not do any of 3 the following: 4 (1) Require an individual licensee to affirm, accept, 5 or support a policy related to sexual orientation or gender 6 identity that conflicts with the personâs sincerely held 7 religious or moral beliefs. 8 (2) Preclude a person from providing child foster care as an 9 individual licensee based, in whole or in part, on the personâs 10 sincerely held religious or moral beliefs related to sexual 11 orientation or gender identity, including but not limited to 12 the personâs intent to guide, instruct, or raise a child in a 13 manner consistent with the personâs sincerely held religious 14 or moral beliefs. 15 b. The department, and the departmentâs designees, shall not 16 adopt a standard, policy, or rule that precludes an individual 17 licensee from being considered as a childâs child foster care 18 provider based, in whole or in part, on the personâs sincerely 19 held religious or moral beliefs related to sexual orientation 20 or gender identity. 21 c. This subsection shall not be interpreted to preclude 22 the department, or the departmentâs designee, from taking 23 into account the sincerely held moral and religious beliefs, 24 including but not limited to the sincerely held moral and 25 religious beliefs related to sexual orientation and gender 26 identity, of a child and the childâs family of origin as 27 compared to the sincerely held moral and religious beliefs of a 28 potential child foster care provider when determining the most 29 appropriate placement for the child consistent with the best 30 interests of the child. 31 d. (1) A current or prospective child foster care provider 32 may bring an action asserting a violation of this subsection. 33 A court may provide the current or prospective child foster 34 care provider injunctive relief, declaratory relief, or other 35 -1- LSB 2019XS (5) 91 dg/ko 1/ 4 S.F. 236 relief as the court deems appropriate, and may award reasonable 1 attorney fees and costs. 2 (2) Notwithstanding chapter 17A, an action under this 3 paragraph may be commenced regardless of whether a current or 4 prospective child foster care provider exhausted all available 5 administrative remedies. 6 (3) The attorney general may bring an action to enforce this 7 subsection. 8 Sec. 2. Section 600.7A, Code 2025, is amended to read as 9 follows: 10 600.7A Adoption services provided by or through the 11 department ââ selection of adoptive parent criteria. 12 1. The department shall adopt rules which provide that if 13 adoption services are provided by or through the department, 14 notwithstanding any other selection of adoptive parent 15 criteria, the overriding criterion shall be a preference for 16 placing a child in a stable home environment as expeditiously 17 as possible. 18 2. a. The department shall not do any of the following: 19 (1) Require a prospective adoptive parent to affirm, 20 accept, or support a policy related to sexual orientation or 21 gender identity that conflicts with the personâs sincerely held 22 religious or moral beliefs. 23 (2) Preclude a person from being qualified as a prospective 24 adoptive parent based, in whole or in part, on the personâs 25 sincerely held religious or moral beliefs related to sexual 26 orientation or gender identity, including but not limited to 27 the personâs intent to guide, instruct, or raise a child in a 28 manner consistent with the personâs sincerely held religious 29 or moral beliefs. 30 b. The department, and the departmentâs designees, shall 31 not adopt a standard, policy, or rule that precludes a person 32 from being considered as a childâs prospective adoptive parent 33 based, in whole or in part, on the personâs sincerely held 34 religious or moral beliefs related to sexual orientation or 35 -2- LSB 2019XS (5) 91 dg/ko 2/ 4 S.F. 236 gender identity. 1 c. This subsection shall not be interpreted to preclude 2 the department from taking into account the sincerely held 3 moral and religious beliefs, including sincerely held moral 4 and religious beliefs related to sexual orientation and gender 5 identity, of a child and the childâs family of origin as 6 compared to the sincerely held moral and religious beliefs 7 of a prospective adoptive parent when determining the most 8 appropriate placement for the child consistent with the best 9 interests of the child. 10 d. (1) A prospective adoptive parent may bring an action 11 asserting a violation of this subsection. A court may provide 12 a prospective adoptive parent injunctive relief, declaratory 13 relief, or other relief as the court deems appropriate, and may 14 award reasonable attorney fees and costs. 15 (2) Notwithstanding chapter 17A, an action under this 16 paragraph may be commenced regardless of whether a prospective 17 adoptive parent exhausted all available administrative 18 remedies. 19 (3) The attorney general may bring an action to enforce this 20 subsection. 21